src-fst-morphology-affixes-adjectives.lexc.md
# Skolt Saami adjective declension

These come directly from the xml to lexc xsltransformation lexica

* : ADJ-DER/COMP_ab ;  This has a Comp+Attr

CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
* LEXICON A_1Â_VCC  papp:papp

CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
* LEXICON A_1Â_VKK  papp:papp

* LEXICON A_1Â_VYXX  põrtt:põrtt
friskk

* LEXICON A_1Â_VYKK  põrtt:põrtt
friskk

* LEXICON A_1Â_VUKK  autt:a%^1VOWutt
friskk

* LEXICON A_MUORR  muõrr:muõrr

* LEXICON A_NUORR  nuõrr:nuõrr

* LEXICON A_SHIOGHGH  šiõǥǥ:šiõǥǥ
Need work on derivation since this only has positive form. 2018-10-13

* LEXICON	A_KOOKKA 	kookka length of/pituinen
no gradation, has preceding genitive 2018-10-13

* LEXICON A_KUOCC  kuõcc:kuõcc

* LEXICON A_CHUOSHKK  čuõškk:čuõškk
tuõlbb

* LEXICON A_MIYRKK  sǩiâŋkk:sǩiâŋkk
hiâlpp

* LEXICON A_PLAAN  plaan:plaan

* LEXICON A_SUYMMM  suâmm:suâmˈm

* LEXICON A_MODDAI  moddai:moddai
* : SG-NOM ; 
* : SG-ABE/ACC/GEN ; 
* :%^RmVow%^I2J%>a SG-ILL ; 
* :%^RmVow%^I2J%>e SG-LOC ; 
* :%^RmVow%^V2VV SG-COM_IN ; 
* :%^I2J%>e ESS/PAR ; 
* :%^Pen%^V2VV PL-NOM ; 
* :%^RmVow%^I2J PL-OBL ; 

CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS

* Yaml: **A-vaeaezhzh**

CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, PALATALIZATION, ILLATIVE IN U NOMINALS

CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
* LEXICON A_NUQBB   nuʹbb:nubb
* Yaml: **A-nubb**

* LEXICON A_1E_UQCC   nuʹbb:nubb
* Yaml: **A-nubb**

* LEXICON A_1E_UQKK   kuʹǩǩ:ku%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}kk
* Yaml: **A-nubb**

* LEXICON A_KUEQLL  kueʹll:kuâll

* LEXICON A_PUEQRR  pueʹrr:puâll

* LEXICON A_1E_UY/EQYKK  mueʹrjj:mueʹrjj

* LEXICON A_MUEQRJJ  mueʹrjj:mueʹrjj

CLASS 1 LOW VOWEL, PALATALIZATION NOMINALS

* LEXICON A_1E_VQCC  väʹll:väll

* LEXICON A_UQCC  uʹcc:u%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}cc

* LEXICON A_1E_VVQCC  sääʹmm:sää%{ʹØ%}mm

* LEXICON A_CHAAQCC  čääʹcc:čää%{ʹØ%}cc

* LEXICON A_PYYQSS  pââʹss:pââ%{ʹØ%}ss, attr = sg.nom.

* LEXICON A_KAQLBB  käʹlbb:kälbb 

* LEXICON A_1E_VQYKK  âʹlǧǧ:â%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}lgg

* LEXICON A_1E_BLEQTKK  bleʹtǩǩ:blẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}tkk, attr = sg.nom.

* LEXICON A_HAAQSKH  hääʹsǩ:hää%{ʹØ%}sk

* LEXICON A_1E_VVQYX_VVQYX  hääʹsǩ:hää%{ʹØ%}sk

no separate attribute form 2018-10-13
Russian loanword 

* LEXICON A_SEQTT  seʹtt:sẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}tt
CHECKME

* LEXICON A_1E_TEQSTT  modeʹrnn:mod%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}rnn

* LEXICON A_KHEQRJJ  ǩeʹrjj:ǩẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}rjj

* LEXICON A_JAEUQRR  jäuʹrr:jä%^1VOWu%{ʹØ%}rr

* LEXICON A_PEIQVV  peiʹvv:pẹ%^1VOWi%{ʹØ%}vv

* LEXICON A_SUEAQKHKH  sueʹǩǩ:suäkk
cuẹʹǩǩ

* LEXICON A_KUEAQTT  kuẹʹtt:kuätt

* LEXICON A_HIEAQNN  hieʹnn:heänn

* LEXICON A_VUEQSS  pueʹšš:puâ%{ʹØ%}šš

* LEXICON A_1E_VWQKKK  jeäʹnn:jeänˈn, jeäʹǧǧ:jeägˈg

* LEXICON A_JEAQNNN  jeäʹnn:jeänˈn, jeäʹǧǧ:jeägˈg

vowel: diphthong A_1E_VWQYXX

* LEXICON A_CHUAQRVV  tuäʹŋǧǧ:tuäŋgg

CLASS denominals in -i
cf. Feist (2012: 198-199)
These will need their own expansions
HOW DOES JIÕʹNNI decline?
* LEXICON A_JIOQNNI  jiõʹnni:jiõnn FIXME 2016-04

* LEXICON A_AQLKHKHI  aʹlǩǩi:a%{ʹØ%}lkk

* LEXICON A_PAERRAI  pärrai:pärr
* LEXICON A_SAELTTAI  sälttai:sältt

* LEXICON A_VELLAI  vellai:vẹ%^1VOWll

CLASS 

-õs ending

* +Pl+Nom:až ENDLEX ;  Check this 2015-02-22

CLASS 4 BISYLLABIC, HIGH VOWEL, MONOPHTHONG, NO PALATALIZATION
IN PENULTIMATE Â:0
* LEXICON A_VOONYS  võõnâs:võnn
* +Pl+Nom: ENDLEX ;  Check this 2015-02-22

* LEXICON A_OODHYS  oođâs:ođđ

* LEXICON A_RAAVYS  raavâs:ra%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}vv, attr raʹvves

* LEXICON A_KOODDYS  kõõddâs:kõdd
* +Pl+Nom:%>âz ENDLEX ;  Check this 2015-02-22

* LEXICON A_MOOCHCHYS  mooččâs:močč

* LEXICON A_JOOSKYS  jõõskâs:jõ%^1VOWskk

* LEXICON A_AARVYS  aarvâs:a%^1VOWrvv

* LEXICON A_PIIUTYS  piiutâs:pihtt

* LEXICON A_FIINYS  fiinâs:fijnn

* LEXICON A_IISYS  iisâs:ijss

* LEXICON A_RUODDYS  ruõddâs:ruõdˈd

* LEXICON A_TUOVYS  tuõvâs:tuõvv

* LEXICON A_VUOIVYS  vuõivâs:vuõivv

* LEXICON A_KUORMYS  kuõrmâs:kuõrmm

* LEXICON A_KOAOAVAS  kååvas:kåvv

* LEXICON A_KOAOADDAS  kååddas:kåådd

* LEXICON A_TOBDDSALLASH  tobddsallaš:tobddsallaš

* LEXICON A_JAELLASH  jällaš:jällaš

* LEXICON A_VAALMYSH  vaalmâš:va%^1VOWlmmâš

* LEXICON A_VEEIDAS  veeidas:veidd

* LEXICON A_PAEAELKAS  päälkas:pä%^1VOWlkkas

* LEXICON A_4A_VWYX_S/Z  kuârmas:kuârmmas

* LEXICON A_CEAEGGAS   ceäggas:ceägˈg

* LEXICON A_AANAR  späʹsseb:späʹsseb

* LEXICON A_CIYLKYLM  kuâstalv:kuâ%{ˈ1%}stalv

* LEXICON A_KUQCCER  kuʹccer:kuʹccer

* LEXICON A_SHUEQTTER  like AANAR, but attr. = sg.nom.

* LEXICON A_KAAQMES   kääʹmes:kämm
* :es A-01_OAQVES ;    kääʹmes:kämmez

* LEXICON A_KAAQLLES   kääʹlles:kä%^1VOWll
* :es A-01_KAAQLLES ;    reeʹǧǧes:rẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}gges

* LEXICON A_REEQGXGXES   reeʹǧǧes:rẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}gg
* :es A-01_REEQGXGXES ;    reeʹǧǧes:rẹ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}gges

* LEXICON A_PUUQTTES   puuʹttes:pu%^1VOWtt
* : A-01_PUUQTTES ;    puuʹttes:pu%^1VOWttes

* LEXICON A_KOAQSHKHES  kååʹšǩes:kå%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}škk

* LEXICON A_JYYQLDES  jââʹldes:jâ%^1VOW%{ʹØ%}ldd

* LEXICON A_KHEEQLES   ǩeeʹles:ǩeâlˈl
* :es A-01_KHEEQLES ; 	ǩeeʹles:ǩeâlˈles

* LEXICON A_PUAQRES   puäʹres:puärˈr
* :es A-01_PUAQRES ;    puäʹres:puärˈres

* LEXICON A_VUAQMES   vuäʹres:vuärˈr
* :es A-01_PUAQRES ;    puäʹres:puärˈres

* LEXICON A_CHUEQDHES   čueʹđes:čuâtˈt
* :es A-01_CHUEQDHES ;    puäʹres:puärˈrez

* LEXICON A_PUEAQRDES   čueʹcǩes:čuäckkez
* :es A-01_PUEAQRDES ;   čueʹcǩes:čuäckkez

* :%^Pen%^PALE%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KKK2ZERO SG-NOM ;  jeeʹel
* :%^Pen%^PALE%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^KKK2GG%^RmVow VOONYS-STEM-PX ;  võnns-

* LEXICON A_TUEJJEEJA  tuejjeeja:tuejjẹẹja

* LEXICON A_PRSPRC-EEI  tuejjeei:tuejjee
* +Err/Orth+Attr:jas ENDLEX ;  c.f. sjm faʹlsǩeejas

WORK HERE 2015-10-14 deverbals
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCÂ_NOGRADE-I  uuidi:uuidi

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCÂ_VCC-I  cõggi:cõggi

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCE_VQCC-I  elstõʹtti:elstõ%^1VOWʹtti

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCÂ_VHXX-I  lahtti:la%^1VOWhtti

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCE_VQHXX-I  puʹhtti:pu%^1VOWhtti
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCÂ_VWCCC-I  kuõʹddi:kuõʹdˈdi

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCE_VWQCCC-I  kuõʹddi:kuõʹdˈdi

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCA_VWHYY-AI  veâhssai

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCÂ_VVCC-I  jõõvvi:jõõvvi
* Yaml: **A-vaeaezhzh**

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCE_VVQCC-I  jooʹtti+A:jooʹtti
* Yaml: **A-vaeaezhzh**
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCE_VVQKK-I  kooʹcci+A:kooʹcci
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCÂ_VVKK-I  lookki:lookki
* LEXICON A_KOBDDI  kobddi:kobddi SEE following A_TOBDDI diff

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCÂ_VWKK-I  ǩiõssi:ǩiõssi

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCE_VWQKK-I  ǩiõʹssi:ǩiõʹssi
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCÂ_VWCC-I  vuõlli:vuõlli

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCE_VWQCC-I  puõʹtti:puõʹtti
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCÂ_VWXYY-I  kuõskki:kuõskki

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCE_VWQXYY-I  hieʹrvvi+A:hieʹrvvi
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCA_VCC-AI  kåččai:kåččai
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCA_VVCC-AI  peellai:peellai
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCA_VVKK-AI  pååssai:pååssai
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCA_VYXX-AI  särnnai:särnnai
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCA_VWCC-AI  vuejjai:vuejjai
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCA_VWKK-AI  reäkkai:reäkkai
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCA_VWCCC-AI  vuäggai:vuägˈgai
* LEXICON A_PRSPRCA_VWXYY-AI  meälttai:meälttai

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCÂ_VYXX-I  äjjnõʹstti:äjjnõʹstti

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCE_VQYXX-I  äjjnõʹstti:äjjnõʹstti

* LEXICON A_LIEQDHDHDHI  lieʹđđi:lieʹđˈđi

* LEXICON A_PRSPRCÂ_VWHCC-I  viõhssi:viõhssi

* LEXICON A_VUOIQNNI  vuõiʹnni:vuõiʹnn%{ʼØ%}i

* LEXICON A_JUURD  juurd:ju%^1VOWrdd

* LEXICON A_MAADD  maadd:ma%^1VOWdd

check this 2015-11-10

## 2. WORDS WITH MULTI-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 293)
## 2.3 Sg.Loc in -est. e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 2.3.2 Sg.Ill in -a
## 2.3.2.1 Has Gradation 
## 2.3.2.1.1 Second syllable vowel loss (Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com; Ess, Par; Pl.Obl)
* Yaml: **A-chaalmtem**

## 2. WORDS WITH MULTI-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 293)
## 2.3 Sg.Loc in -est. e-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 2.3.2 Sg.Ill in -a
## 2.3.2.1 Has Gradation 
## 2.3.2.1.1 Second syllable vowel loss (Sg.Ill, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com; Ess, Par; Pl.Obl)
* Yaml: **A-chaalmtem**

CLASS 11 ADJECTIVES
* LEXICON A_SHIYLGGYD  šiâlggâd:šiâlgg

* LEXICON A_LOSSYD  lossâd:loss

* LEXICON A_11Y_VYKK  viskkâd:viskk

* LEXICON A_VISKKYD  viskkâd:viskk

* LEXICON A_KOSSYD  kõssâd:kõss

* LEXICON A_MOASHSHAD  måššad:måšš

* LEXICON A_AQKHKHED  âʹǩǩed:âʹǩǩ

säʹmmlaž:säʹmml

ânnʼjõž:ânnʼj

muõrâž:muõr

* +Der+Der/toovvyd+V+IV:»tõõvv IV_LAUKKOOLLYD ;  privative = carative + translative

Class 12 Feist 163
* +Der+Der/Comp+A:»ba A-02_SG-ILL ;  Sammallahti (1991: 188)
* +Der+Der/Comp+A:»be A-02_SG-LOC ;  Sammallahti (1991: 188)
* +Der+Der/Comp+A:»b A-02_SG-COM_IN ;  Sammallahti (1991: 188)
* +Der+Der/Comp+A:»b A-02_PL-OBL ;  Sammallahti (1991: 188)

Sammallahti 2010: 151

N›A derivation in +Der+Der/N2A

1A (Feist 2011: 198-199)

1B (Feist 2011: 198-199)

1C (Feist 2011: 198-199)

determiner

determiner

determiner

determiner
determiner

* LEXICON A-ORD_NEELLJAD  neelljad:neellj
similar_to: A_MOASHSHAD

* LEXICON DET_DOHTAD  doohhtad:doohht

CLASS 1 HIGH VOWEL, NO PALATALIZATION NOMINALS
pa%{a0%}%{ʹ0%}%{p0%}p
V%{V0%}%{ʹ0%}%{C0%}C
Sg_Nom:
high-vowel=yes
monophthong=yes
long-vowel=yes
palatalization=no
consonantism=quant-gem
long-consonant=yes

1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|geminate" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|geminate" 

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
Palatalized: Sg.Ill
Not Palatalized: ELSE
Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Strong grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-papp**
strong_geminate, short_vowel
* : A-02_SG-NOM ;			 papp
* :%>â A-02_ESS/PAR ; 	  		 pappân, pappâd
strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization
* :%^PAL%>e A-02_SG-ILL ;		 paʹppe

strong_geminate, long_vowel
* :%^V2VV A-02_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	 paapp
* :%^V2VV%>â A-02_SG-LOC ;		 paappâst
* :%^V2VV A-02_SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;	 paappi, paappid, paappid, paappin, paappivuiʹm, paappitaa

* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^V2VV A-02_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;   paapp-
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^V2VV%^PAL A-02_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;   paaʹpp-

e.g. 
e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3

pa%{a0%}%{ʹ0%}%{p0%}p
V%{V0%}%{ʹ0%}%{C0%}C
Sg_Nom:
high-vowel=yes
monophthong=yes
long-vowel=yes
palatalization=no
consonantism=quant-gem
long-consonant=yes

1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|geminate" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|geminate" 

## 1. WORDS WITH SINGLE-SYLLABLE NOMINATIVE SINGULARS (2009: 167)
## 1.1 Sg.Loc in -âst (no vowel shift, all raised)
â-stems (Sg.Loc, Ess, Par).
## 1.1.1 Sg.Ill vowel	-e
## 1.1.1.1 Has Palatalization
## 1.1.1.1[1] (Palatalization pattern)
Palatalized: Sg.Ill
Not Palatalized: ELSE
Sg.Ill in palatalization and -e
## 1.1.1.1[1].1 Lacks Specifically Pedagogical Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1 Has Orthographic Gradation
## 1.1.1.1[1].1.1[] (Monophthong + Consonant Geminate alternation)
Extra strong grade: Sg.Nom, Ess, Par
Extra strong grade: Sg.Ill
Strong grade: Pl.Nom, Sg.Loc, Sg.Com
## FORMS
* Yaml: **N-papp**
strong_geminate, short_vowel
* : A-02_SG-NOM ;			 papp
* :%>â A-02_ESS/PAR ; 	  		 pappân, pappâd
strong_geminate, short_vowel, palatalization
* :%^PAL%>e A-02_SG-ILL ;		 paʹppe

strong_geminate, long_vowel
* :%^V2VV A-02_SG-ABE/ACC/GEN_PL-NOM ;	 paapp
* :%^V2VV%>â A-02_SG-LOC ;		 paappâst
* :%^V2VV A-02_SG-COM_IN/PL-OBL ;	 paappi, paappid, paappid, paappin, paappivuiʹm, paappitaa

* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^V2VV A-02_MUORYZH-WITHOUT-PAL ;   paapp-
* +Der+Der/Dimin+A:%^V2VV%^PAL A-02_MUORYZH-WITH-PAL ;   paaʹpp-

e.g. 
e.g. +Use/NG+Sg+Loc+PxSg3

Sg_Nom: vow_mono:vow_short:vow_high:pal_no:cns_xyy
similar_to: N_TAALKYS, N_KOONTYR
1.1.1.1.1.1. Sg_Nom="short_vowel|long_cluster" Sg_Gen="long_vowel|short_cluster" 
